Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 5. Mississippi Support Animal Act.

§ 43-6-151.
Short title.

Sections 43-6-151 through 43-6-155 shall be known as and may be cited as the “Mississippi Support Animal Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 386, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 523, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 43-6-153.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Mobility impaired person” means any person, regardless of age, who is subject to a physiological defect or deficiency regardless of its cause, nature, or extent that renders the person unable to move about without the aid of crutches, a wheelchair or any other form of support, or that limits the person’s functional ability to ambulate, climb, descend, sit, rise, or to perform any related function.

“Blind” means either of the following:

Vision 20/200 or less in the better eye with proper correction.

Field defect in the better eye with proper correction which contracts the peripheral field so that the diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than twenty (20) degrees.

“Traumatic event” means a life-threatening event such as military combat, natural disaster, terrorist incident, serious accident or violent personal assault of a physical or sexual nature that occurred while an individual was on active duty or deployment as a member of the United States Armed Services.

“Post traumatic stress disorder” or PTSD means an anxiety disorder that occurs following the experience of a frightening, distressing or traumatic event or from witnessing a traumatic event. PTSD is also referred to as “post traumatic stress syndrome” or PTSS.

“Support animal” means an animal individually trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a disability, including a physical, sensory, psychiatric, intellectual or other mental disability. The work done or task performed must be directly related to the individual’s disability and may include, but not be limited to:

Guiding individuals who are visually impaired or blind;

Alerting individuals who are hearing impaired or deaf to an intruder or sounds;

Providing minimal protection or rescue work;

Pulling a wheelchair;

Fetching dropped items;

Detecting the onset of a seizure, and alerting and protecting individuals having a seizure;

Retrieving objects;

Alerting an individual to the presence of allergens;

Providing physical support and assistance with balance and stability to an individual with a mobility disability;

Helping an individual with a psychiatric or neurological disability by preventing or interrupting impulsive or destructive behaviors;

Reminding an individual with mental illness to take prescribed medication;

Calming an individual with post traumatic stress disorder during an anxiety attack; or

Doing other specific work or performing other special tasks.

The term “support animal” includes service animals, guide animals, seeing-eye animals, hearing-ear animals, therapeutic animals, comfort animals and facility animals. However, the term “support animal” does not mean an animal considered a pet, and is limited to a dog or miniature horse.

“Support animal trainer” means a person who trains or raises support animals for individuals with disabilities, whether the person is a professional trainer, or serving as a volunteer with a professional trainer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 386, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1989; Laws, 2018, ch. 341, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 43-6-155.
Support animals’ access to public places; limitations.

Any blind person, mobility impaired person, armed services veteran diagnosed with PTSD or hearing impaired person who uses a support animal specifically trained as a guide, leader, listener or for any other necessary assistance in day-to-day activities shall be entitled to the full and equal accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges of all public conveyances, hotels, lodging places, businesses open to the public for the sale of any goods or services and all places of public accommodation, amusement, or resort and other places to which the general public is invited, and may take the support animal into conveyances and places, subject only to the conditions and limitations applicable to all persons not so accompanied, except that:

The support animal shall not occupy a seat in any public conveyance.

The support animal shall be upon a leash or otherwise sufficiently restrained in a manner appropriate for the animal while using the facilities of a common carrier.

Support animal trainers shall have the same rights of accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges with support animals-in-training as those provided to blind persons, mobility impaired persons, hearing impaired persons or veterans diagnosed with PTSD with support animals under this section.

No person shall deprive a blind person, mobility impaired person, hearing impaired person, veteran diagnosed with PTSD or a support animal trainer of any of the advantages, facilities or privileges provided in this section, nor charge such blind person, mobility impaired person, hearing impaired person, veteran diagnosed with PTSD or support animal trainer a fee or charge for the use of the animal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 386, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 478, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 523, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2000; Laws, 2018, ch. 341, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.